Maryland, session 2026, HB1149.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–219.
(a) In this section, “claim” includes a claim that is reduced to judgment.
(b) (1) Subject EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION AND SUBJECT to the limitations in this section, the Comptroller may settle
a claim of the State that [has been] IS in arrears [for at least 2 years]:
(1) (I) against a person who receives or collects State money;
(2) (II) against the surety of that person; or
(3) (III) against any other person.
(2) IF A CLAIM OF THE STATE IS IN ARREARS AGAINST A BUSINESS
ENTITY THAT HAS PERMANENTLY CEASED OPERATIONS, THE COMPTROLLER MAY
SETTLE A CLAIM OF THE STATE REGARDLESS OF THE PERIOD OF TIME FOR WHICH
THE CLAIM HAS BEEN IN ARREARS.
(c) Before settling a claim under this section, the Comptroller shall examine the
claim thoroughly and shall be satisfied that the State could not collect the claim through
legal process.
– 1 –

Ch. 311 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(d) To settle a claim so as best to serve the interests of the State, the Comptroller
may abate, wholly or partly, the principal or interest that is due to the State.
(e) The Comptroller shall discharge a person and the surety of the person when
the agreed sum is paid into the State Treasury.
(f) (1) If a claim is settled without payment in full, the Comptroller shall keep
a record that states the facts on which the settlement was based.
(2) The record shall be kept in the Office of the Comptroller.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 28, 2026.
– 2 –